Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.730

Notice to parents and guardians of student assessments, graduation requirements, and additional district graduation requirements.

(1) At the beginning of each school year, school districts must notify parents and guardians of enrolled students from eighth through twelfth grade about each student assessment required by the state, the minimum state-level graduation requirements, and any additional school district graduation requirements. The information may be provided when the student is enrolled, contained in the student or parent handbook, or posted on the school district's website. The notification must include the following:

(a) When each assessment will be administered;

(b) Whether the results of the assessment will be used for program placement or grade-level advancement;

(c) When the assessment results will be released to parents or guardians and whether there will be an opportunity for parents and teachers to discuss strategic adjustments; and

(d) Whether the assessment is required by the school district, state, federal government, or more than one of these entities.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide information to the school districts to enable the districts to provide the information to the parents and guardians in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2019 c 252 s 114; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.320.208.]

NOTES:

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Findings—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 22: See note following RCW 28A.655.068.